Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.908

Hazing—Social fraternity and sorority organizations.

(1) Social fraternity and sorority organizations shall notify the public or private institution of higher education before chartering, rechartering, opening, or reopening a local chapter or operating at the public or private institution of higher education.

(2) Social fraternity and sorority organizations shall notify the public or private institution of higher education when the organization instigates an investigation of a local chapter at the public or private institution of higher education for hazing or other activity that includes an element of hazing, such as furnishing alcohol to minors. The organization shall provide the results of such investigation and a copy of the full findings report to the public or private institution of higher education's student conduct office.

(3) Beginning in the 2022 fall academic term, any local social fraternity or sorority chapter seeking to obtain or maintain registration with any public or private institution of higher education in the state must certify in writing and provide weblinks to that institution showing that the landing pages of all websites owned or maintained by the local chapter contain a full list for the previous five years of all findings of violations of antihazing policies, state or federal laws relating to hazing, alcohol, drugs, sexual assault, or physical assault, or the institution's code of conduct against the local chapter.

(4) Failure of a social fraternity or sorority organization to comply with subsections (1) through (3) of this section shall result in automatic loss of recognition until such time that the organization comes into compliance with those subsections.

[ 2022 c 209 s 6.]

NOTES:

Short title—2022 c 209: See note following RCW 28B.10.900.